






Business Directories by State
































Locations

            Top States:

                Florida
- (7,668,568 Businesses)
California
- (7,998,712 Businesses)
Texas
- (4,844,132 Businesses)
New York
- (4,451,440 Businesses)
Pennsylvania
- (1,273,348 Businesses)

Advertisements









States












                                                        Alabama
                                                    




                                                        424,733 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        529,179 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Alaska
                                                    




                                                        90,124 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        119,266 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Arizona
                                                    




                                                        757,578 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        800,057 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Arkansas
                                                    




                                                        263,265 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        325,845 People Found
                                                    










                                                        California
                                                    




                                                        7,998,712 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        7,373,829 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Colorado
                                                    




                                                        810,965 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        814,457 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Connecticut
                                                    




                                                        468,529 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        572,170 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Delaware
                                                    




                                                        132,203 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        114,760 People Found
                                                    










                                                        District Of Columbia
                                                    




                                                        101,098 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        225,569 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Florida
                                                    




                                                        7,668,568 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        10,379,305 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Georgia
                                                    




                                                        1,255,913 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,396,340 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Hawaii
                                                    




                                                        129,778 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        152,776 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Idaho
                                                    




                                                        172,946 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        201,511 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Illinois
                                                    




                                                        1,181,777 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,483,851 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Indiana
                                                    




                                                        578,336 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        719,895 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Iowa
                                                    




                                                        329,478 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        460,060 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Kansas
                                                    




                                                        282,167 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        348,203 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Kentucky
                                                    




                                                        405,364 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        504,609 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Louisiana
                                                    




                                                        633,706 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        615,570 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Maine
                                                    




                                                        130,772 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        174,828 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Maryland
                                                    




                                                        674,762 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        710,573 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Massachusetts
                                                    




                                                        726,391 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,027,525 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Michigan
                                                    




                                                        934,309 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,131,011 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Minnesota
                                                    




                                                        592,079 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        758,211 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Mississippi
                                                    




                                                        261,251 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        322,667 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Missouri
                                                    




                                                        597,997 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        706,323 People Found
                                                    














                                                        Montana
                                                    




                                                        130,347 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        158,428 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Nebraska
                                                    




                                                        191,594 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        279,673 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Nevada
                                                    




                                                        1,037,013 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,194,143 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Hampshire
                                                    




                                                        154,616 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        193,717 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Jersey
                                                    




                                                        974,361 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,091,903 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New Mexico
                                                    




                                                        178,355 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        231,696 People Found
                                                    










                                                        New York
                                                    




                                                        4,451,440 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        2,890,350 People Found
                                                    










                                                        North Carolina
                                                    




                                                        989,346 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,123,727 People Found
                                                    










                                                        North Dakota
                                                    




                                                        81,418 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        101,993 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Ohio
                                                    




                                                        1,062,590 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,335,494 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Oklahoma
                                                    




                                                        379,566 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        422,307 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Oregon
                                                    




                                                        510,731 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        621,776 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Pennsylvania
                                                    




                                                        1,273,348 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,546,222 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Puerto Rico
                                                    




                                                        55,527 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        60,845 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Rhode Island
                                                    




                                                        111,772 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        132,878 People Found
                                                    










                                                        South Carolina
                                                    




                                                        406,911 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        483,894 People Found
                                                    










                                                        South Dakota
                                                    




                                                        92,785 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        126,265 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Tennessee
                                                    




                                                        620,250 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        751,954 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Texas
                                                    




                                                        4,844,132 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        5,747,634 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Utah
                                                    




                                                        363,011 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        377,419 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Vermont
                                                    




                                                        81,906 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        106,956 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Virginia
                                                    




                                                        911,909 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        1,016,492 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Washington
                                                    




                                                        830,493 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        864,074 People Found
                                                    










                                                        West Virginia
                                                    




                                                        136,960 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        185,319 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Wisconsin
                                                    




                                                        486,944 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        707,971 People Found
                                                    










                                                        Wyoming
                                                    




                                                        77,247 Companies Found
                                                    


                                                        90,781 People Found
                                                    













                Company Directory:
            
            Browse directory by company name:
            
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
(more)







People Directory: 

            Names starting with letters:

            
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
















You must be signed in to print.
Once signed in, look for the PDF button.






















 






FALCON CLASSIC CABLE INCOME PROPERTIES LP - Current report filing (8-K) EXHIBIT 1





















About EDGAR Online

|
Login












Dashboard
TodayCompany
Industry
Search
Screener
Analytics

  










 















Enter your Email for a Free Trial:








The following is an excerpt from a 8-K SEC Filing, filed by FALCON CLASSIC CABLE INCOME PROPERTIES LP on 6/30/1997.





 Next Section












 Previous Section





-- Use Sections To Navigate Through The Document --
FORM 8-K
ITEM 5.    OTHER EVENTS
Item 7.  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL ...
SIGNATURES
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
EXHIBIT 1
EXHIBIT 2












FALCON CLASSIC CABLE INCOME PROPERTIES LP - 8-K - 19970630 - EXHIBIT_1





ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT



by and among



FALCON COMMUNITY CABLE, L.P.,


a Delaware limited partnership,



FALCON CABLE MEDIA,


a California limited partnership,



FALCON CABLE SYSTEMS COMPANY II, L.P.,


a California limited partnership


and



FALCON CLASSIC CABLE INCOME PROPERTIES, L.P.,


a California limited partnership,



Dated as of June 27, 1997







ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT



ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT, dated as of June 27, 1997 (this
"Agreement") by and among Falcon Classic Cable Income Properties, L.P., a
California limited partnership ("FCCI"), Falcon Community Cable, L.P., a
Delaware limited partnership ("Community Cable"), Falcon Cable Media, a
California limited partnership ("Cable Media"), and Falcon Cable Systems Company
II, L.P., a California limited partnership ("Cable Systems II") (Community
Cable, Cable Media and Cable Systems II are collectively referred to herein as
the "Purchasers" and each a "Purchaser").



RECITALS



A.       Falcon Classic Cable Investors, L.P., a California
limited partnership (the "General Partner"), is the general partner of FCCI.


B.       Pursuant to Section 4.9 of the Amended and Restated
Agreement of Limited Partnership of FCCI, dated as of May 15, 1989 (the
"Partnership Agreement") (capitalized terms used in this Agreement and not
otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning ascribed thereto in the
Partnership Agreement), the General Partner may cause the sale of all or
substantially all of the Cable Systems to the General Partner or to any
Affiliate of the General Partner for cash at the median of three independent
appraised values of fair market value pursuant to the Appraisal Process (the
"Appraised Value").


C.       Falcon Holding Group, L.P., a Delaware limited
partnership ("FHGLP"), (i) is the general partner of the General Partner, (ii)
is a general partner of Community Cable, (iii) is a general partner of Cable
Media, and (iv) is a general partner of Cable Systems II.


D.       As a result of the relationships described in the
foregoing recitals, the Purchasers are Affiliates of the General Partner.


E.       Pursuant to an Assignment of Right to Purchase, dated
as of the date hereof, among the General Partner and each of the Purchasers, the
General Partner has assigned to the Purchasers the right to purchase all of the
Cable Systems of FCCI at their Appraised Value.


F.       The Purchasers desire to purchase all of the Cable
Systems of FCCI at their Appraised Value and the General Partner desires to
cause FCCI to sell all of the Cable Systems of FCCI to the Purchasers at their
Appraised Value in accordance with Section 4.9 of the Partnership Agreement.



AGREEMENT



NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the
representations, warranties, covenants and agreements contained herein, and for
other good





and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby
acknowledged, and intending to be legally bound hereby, the parties hereto
hereby agree as follows:



ARTICLE I.




DEFINITIONS



SECTION 1.1. DEFINED TERMS. The following terms, as used in
this Agreement, shall have the following meanings (and such meanings shall be
equally applicable to both the singular and plural forms of the terms defined
herein):


"Bill of Sale" shall mean such bills of sale, instruments of
conveyance and assignment and assumption as may be necessary to effect the Sale
of the Cable Systems.


"Cable Systems" shall mean, collectively, all right, title and
interest of FCCI in all assets, rights, privileges, interests, claims and
properties, whether tangible or intangible, owned, used or held by FCCI for use
in connection with the provision of cable television services and, if required
by the context, the five specific Cable Systems owned and operated by FCCI in
Redmond, Oregon (the "Redmond Cable System"), Burke County, North Carolina (the
"Burke County Cable System"), Somerset, Kentucky (the "Somerset Cable System"),
Centreville, Maryland (the "Centreville Cable System"), and California City,
California (the "California City Cable System").


"Cable System Contracts" shall mean all contracts, purchase
orders and other agreements of FCCI to the extent relating to the construction,
operation or maintenance of the Cable Systems. Cable System Contracts shall not
include any Local Authorization or FCC License.


"Closing" shall mean the consummation of the Sale.


"Communications Act" shall mean the Communications Act of
1934, as amended.


"FCC" shall mean the Federal Communications Commission.


"FCC Consents" shall mean consents of the FCC to the transfer
of the FCC Licenses to the Purchasers in connection with the Sale.


"FCC Licenses" shall mean the licenses and permits of the FCC
held by FCCI in connection with the operation of the Cable Systems.


"Franchise Areas" shall mean the areas in which FCCI is
authorized to provide cable television service under the Local Authorizations
and the areas served by any of the Cable Systems in which FCCI provides cable
television service without a Local Authorization.


2





"Governmental Authority" shall mean any federal, state,
municipal or local governmental authority or political subdivision thereof.


"HSR Act" shall mean the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust
Improvements Act of 1976, as amended.


"Legal Requirement" shall mean the requirements of any law,
ordinance, statute, rule, regulation, code, order, judgment, decree, injunction,
franchise, determination, approval, permit, license, authorization or other
requirement of any Governmental Authority.


"Lien" shall mean, with respect to any asset, any mortgage,
lien, pledge, charge, security interest, adverse claim or encumbrance of any
kind in respect of such asset.


"Local Authority" shall mean any Governmental Authority having
jurisdiction to grant a cable television franchise with respect to all or a
portion of any Cable System.


"Local Authority Consent" shall mean any approval,
authorization or consent of a Local Authority necessary for a change in control
of a Local Authorization or otherwise in connection with the consummation of the
Sale.


"Local Authorizations" shall mean all authorizations,
approvals, franchises, licenses and permits of Local Authorities granted to the
Partnership which permit the operation of the Cable Systems as amended, modified
or supplemented.


"Material Adverse Effect" shall mean a material adverse effect
on the business, financial condition, results of operations or prospects of the
business of FCCI or any of the Cable Systems.


"Permitted Liens" shall mean (i) Liens for Taxes not yet due
and payable; (ii) any carrier's, warehousemen's, mechanic's, materialmen's,
repairmen's, employees' or other like Lien arising in the ordinary course of
business; (iii) easements, rights-of-way, restrictions, encroachments and other
similar encumbrances which do not materially interfere with the use of the Cable
Systems as presently used; and (iv) rights of first refusal in favor of, and
restrictions imposed by, Governmental Authorities.


"Person" shall mean and include an individual, a corporation,
a partnership (general, limited or limited liability), a joint venture, a
limited liability company, an association, a trust or any other organization or
entity, including a Governmental Authority.


"Purchase Price" shall mean $82,000,000 in the aggregate,
allocated among the Cable Systems as provided in Schedule 2.1.


"Right of First Refusal" shall mean any right of first refusal
of a Local Authority in regard to or arising as a result of the Sale.


3





"Taxes" shall mean all taxes, fees, duties, imposts, levies,
withholdings, tax deficiencies, assessments, and charges, including, without
limitation, all net income, gross income, gross receipts, sales, use,
value-added, ad valorem, transfer, franchise, profits, license, withholding,
payroll, employment, excise, estimated, severance, stamp, occupation, property
or other taxes and customs duties of any kind whatsoever, together with any
interest and any penalties, additions to tax or additional amounts relating
thereto, imposed by any Governmental Authority (domestic or foreign).


"Unapproved FCC Assets" shall mean all equipment relating to
Unapproved FCC Licenses.


"Unapproved FCC License" shall mean an FCC License as to which
all FCC Consents have not been obtained or do not remain in full force and
effect immediately prior to the Closing Date.


"Unapproved Franchise Areas" shall mean Franchise Areas
covered by Unapproved Local Authorizations.


"Unapproved Franchise Assets" shall mean, with respect to all
Unapproved Franchise Areas, all Unapproved Local Authorizations and all related
real property and equipment.


"Unapproved Local Authorizations" shall mean a Local
Authorization (other than Right of First Refusal Local Authorizations) as to
which all Local Authority Consents have not been obtained or do not remain in
full force and effect immediately prior to the Closing Date.



ARTICLE II.




PURCHASE AND SALE



SECTION 2.1. PURCHASE AND SALE.


(a) Subject to the satisfaction or waiver in writing of the
conditions set forth herein and to the other terms, conditions and provisions
hereof, on a date as soon as practicable following the satisfaction or waiver of
the conditions set forth herein (the "Closing Date"), FCCI shall execute and
deliver to each Purchaser a Bill of Sale pursuant to which FCCI shall sell,
convey, assign, transfer and deliver to the Purchasers, and the Purchasers shall
purchase, acquire, accept and pay for, all of FCCI's right, title and interest
in all Cable Systems owned by FCCI, including, subject to Section 2.2, FCCI's
rights under the Cable System Contracts and each Purchaser shall execute and
deliver a Bill of Sale and thereby assume and agree to perform in accordance
with their terms the Cable System Contracts, FCC Licenses and Local
Authorizations (the "Sale"). Schedule 2.1 hereto sets forth the Cable Systems of
FCCI to be purchased by each respective Purchaser and the portion of the
Purchase Price to be paid by each such Purchaser.


4





(b) At the Closing, the Purchasers shall, severally but not
jointly, deliver to FCCI the Purchase Price related to the respective Cable
Systems to be purchased by them in immediately available funds (by wire transfer
to an account designated in writing by FCCI prior to the Closing Date).


SECTION 2.2.  LACK OF CONSENTS. If the Sale requires the
consent of another Person under any Cable System Contract and such consent has
not been obtained prior to the Closing Date or does not remain in full force and
effect at the Closing Date, such failure to obtain such consent or failure of
such consent to be in full force and effect shall not itself constitute a breach
of any provision hereof. FCCI shall, with respect to each such Cable System
Contract, use its reasonable commercial efforts (at the expense of the Purchaser
of such Cable System Contract and at no out-of-pocket expense to FCCI, but
without such Purchaser being required to provide any consideration therefor) to:

(i) keep each such Cable System Contract in effect and obtain such consent; (ii)
provide to the appropriate Purchaser the benefits of each such Cable System
Contract through subcontract or otherwise; (iii) cooperate in any reasonable
arrangement designed to provide such benefits to such Purchaser; and (iv)
enforce, at the request and sole expense of the appropriate Purchaser, any
rights of such Purchaser included in the Cable Systems under or with respect to
any such Cable System Contract against all other Persons (including termination
of the foregoing in accordance with the terms thereof upon the election of such
Purchaser), in each case of clauses (i)-(iv) to the extent that any Purchaser
performs all obligations of FCCI under such Cable System Contract. If all such
consents under any such Cable System Contract are obtained after the Closing
Date, FCCI shall promptly assign such Cable System Contract to the appropriate
Purchaser and such Purchaser shall assume all obligations under such Cable
System Contract with respect to periods following such assignment, in each case
without the payment of additional consideration by any Purchaser or FCCI.


SECTION 2.3.  LACK OF REGULATORY APPROVALS.


(a) If immediately prior to the Closing Date any Local
Authority Consent or FCC Consent has not been obtained or does not remain in
full force and effect immediately prior to the Closing Date, such failure to
obtain such Local Authority Consent or FCC Consent or such failure of such Local
Authority Consents or FCC Consent to be in full force and effect shall not
itself constitute a breach of any provision hereof.


(b) If at any time following the Closing Date, FCCI is able to
transfer to the appropriate Purchaser (or a designee of such Purchaser) an
Unapproved Local Authorization or an Unapproved FCC License, FCCI shall promptly
transfer to such Purchaser (or such designee of such Purchaser) such Unapproved
Local Authorization and all related Unapproved Franchise Assets and such
Unapproved FCC License and all related Unapproved FCC Assets, as the case may
be. Such Purchaser (or such designee of such Purchaser), as the case may be,
shall assume, pay, perform and discharge the obligations arising after the
Closing Date under or in respect of any such Unapproved Local Authorization or
Unapproved FCC License so transferred.


5





SECTION 2.4.  RECEIPT OF CONSENTS. It is the intent of the
parties that the arrangements described in Sections 2.2 and 2.3 continue for the
shortest possible time, and to this end they agree to use reasonable commercial
efforts to obtain all consents (including Local Authority Consents) to the Sale
referred to in said Sections as promptly as practicable following the Closing
Date. FHGLP shall coordinate the efforts to obtain such consents, and the
Purchasers shall be responsible for all costs, expenses, liabilities,
obligations and burdens with respect to such consents (allocated to the
appropriate Cable System).


SECTION 2.5.  NO ASSUMPTION OF LIABILITIES. FCCI shall retain,
shall continue to be responsible after the Closing for, shall pay, perform and
discharge, and shall indemnify and hold the Purchasers and each of their
Affiliates harmless from and against, all liabilities and obligations (whether
incurred, accrued, arising or known prior to, at or after the Closing, whether
or not known, suspected, asserted or claimed at the Closing or at any time
theretofore or thereafter, whether or not reflected or provided for, or required
to be reflected or provided for, in any balance sheet of FCCI and whether fixed,
liquidated, unliquidated, absolute, contingent or otherwise) which relate to or
arise out of the business, assets or operations of FCCI as heretofore, currently
or hereafter conducted through the Closing Date, any of the Cable Systems or the
past operation, condition or use of any of the Cable Systems, including those
related to: (i) product liability; (ii) general tort liability; (iii) any other
activity undertaken by FCCI or relating to any of the Cable Systems; or (iv) any
obligation or liability of FCCI to any of its partners or in respect of any
management fee or sales fee; other, however, than obligations under the Cable
System Contracts, FCC Licenses and Local Authorizations specifically assumed by
a Purchaser.



ARTICLE III.




REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF FCCI



FCCI represents and warrants to the Purchasers that:


SECTION 3.1. EXISTENCE AND POWER. FCCI (i) is a limited
partnership duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws
of the State of California, (ii) is authorized to transact business and is in
good standing in each state in which its ownership of assets or conduct of
business requires such qualification, and (iii) has all partnership powers
required to carry on its business as conducted on the date hereof, with such
exceptions to clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) as would not have a Material Adverse
Effect or materially and adversely affect the ability of any Purchaser to
consummate the Sale.


SECTION 3.2. AUTHORIZATION. FCCI has the partnership power to
own and operate the Cable Systems. FCCI has the partnership power to enter into
this Agreement and to consummate the Sale. The execution and delivery by FCCI of
this Agreement and the consummation by FCCI of the Sale has been duly authorized
by all necessary partnership action.


6





SECTION 3.3.  GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATION. The execution and
delivery of this Agreement by FCCI, and the performance by FCCI of this
Agreement, and the consummation by FCCI of the Sale, require no material action
by or in respect of, or material filing with, any Governmental Authority other
than compliance with any applicable requirements of the HSR Act, and the Local
Authorizations.


SECTION 3.4.  CONSENTS. Except as set out in Schedule 3.4, no
material consent by any Person under any Cable System Contract is required or
necessary for the execution and delivery of this Agreement by FCCI, or the
performance by FCCI of this Agreement, or the consummation of the Sale
contemplated to be consummated by it pursuant hereto, except as would not have a
Material Adverse Effect.


SECTION 3.5.  NON-CONTRAVENTION.


(a) The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement
by FCCI, and the consummation by FCCI of the Sale, do not and on or before the
Closing Date will not, (x) contravene the Partnership Agreement or (y) subject
to obtaining the consents described in Section 3.3 and subject to obtaining,
taking or making the actions and filings described in Schedule 3.4, result in
the imposition of any Lien upon any assets of FCCI pursuant to, or constitute a
breach or default (including any event that, with the passage of time or giving
of notice, or both, would become a breach or default) under or give rise to a
right of termination, cancellation, first refusal or acceleration under any
applicable Legal Requirement or any judgment, injunction, order, decree,
contract, license, lease, indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note or other
agreement or instrument as to which FCCI is a party or by which any of its
properties may be bound, the effect of which would be to materially impair the
ability of FCCI to perform its obligations under this Agreement.


(b) FCCI is not in breach or default (including any event
that, with the passage of time or giving of notice, or both, would become a
breach or default) under any Cable System Contract or contract by which any of
its assets may be bound, the effect of which would be to impair the ability of
FCCI in any material respect to operate any Cable System as presently operated.


SECTION 3.6.  BINDING EFFECT. This Agreement has been duly
executed and delivered by FCCI, and when executed by the parties hereto, this
Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of FCCI, enforceable
against FCCI in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be
limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or
similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally or by the principles
governing the availability of equitable remedies.


SECTION 3.7.  SYSTEMS; AUTHORIZATIONS; LICENSES.


(a) Each Local Authorization (x) is in all material respects
validly held by FCCI in accordance with and as required by the terms thereof and
according to all material applicable Legal Requirements and (y) is in all
material respects in full force and effect and has not been revoked or canceled
and FCCI is in material compliance therewith. To the


7





knowledge of FCCI; no proceeding to revoke, cancel or modify in any manner any
such Local Authorization has been initiated or threatened in writing.


(b) Each FCC License (x) is in all material respects validly
held by FCCI in accordance with and as required by the terms thereof and
according to all material applicable Legal Requirements and (y) is in all
material respects in full force and effect and has not been revoked or canceled
and FCCI is in material compliance therewith. To the knowledge of FCCI, no
proceeding to revoke, cancel or modify in any manner any such FCC License has
been initiated or threatened in writing.


SECTION 3.8.  ASSETS. FCCI has good and marketable title to,
or a valid leasehold or license interest in, all assets purported to be owned,
leased or licensed by FCCI which constitute the Cable Systems, free and clear of
all Liens other than Permitted Liens and other than any Liens which shall be
fully satisfied, discharged and released effective as of the Closing. Each Bill
of Sale is sufficient to transfer to the identified Purchaser good and, subject
to Permitted Liens, marketable title to the Cable Systems to be acquired by such
Purchaser as set forth on Schedule 2.1.


SECTION 3.9.  INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY. To the knowledge of FCCI,
the conduct of its business does not infringe upon the patents, trademarks,
trade names or other intellectual property rights of any Person, with such
exceptions as would not result in a Material Adverse Effect.


SECTION 3.10.  CABLE SYSTEM CONTRACTS.


(a) FCCI is not in material default or breach of any Cable
System Contract and, to the knowledge of FCCI, (i) there exists no state of
facts which after notice or lapse of time or both would constitute such a
material default or breach and (ii) no other party to such Cable System Contract
is in default or breach thereunder.


(b) The real property and personal property which are the
subject of leases that constitute Cable System Contracts are currently used in
the construction, operation or maintenance of the FCCI business.


SECTION 3.11.  LITIGATION. There are no actions, suits or
proceedings pending and, to the knowledge of FCCI, there are no claims,
grievances, governmental investigations, actions, suits or proceedings
threatened, against or affecting FCCI with respect to its business at law or in
equity or before or by any Governmental Authority, or before or by an arbitrator
or arbitration board which would have a Material Adverse Effect or materially
delay the Closing. Except as set out in Schedule 3.11, there are no judgments,
decrees or orders outstanding against FCCI with respect to its business or any
of the Cable Systems or the Sale.


SECTION 3.12.  COMPLIANCE WITH LEGAL REQUIREMENTS.  (i) FCCI
is in compliance with all applicable Legal Requirements and (ii) FCCI's business
is being conducted in compliance with all applicable Legal Requirements, with
such exceptions to


8





clauses (i) and (ii) as would not have a Material Adverse Effect or materially
delay the Closing.


SECTION 3.13.  REPORTS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENTS. FCCI has
filed all reports required to be filed with the Securities Exchange Commission
("SEC") since January 1, 1994 (collectively, the "FCCI SEC Reports"), and has
previously furnished or made available to the Purchasers true and complete
copies of all the FCCI SEC Reports. None of the FCCI SEC Reports, as of their
respective dates (as amended through the date hereof), contained any untrue
statement of material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be
stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the
circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. Each of the balance
sheets (including the related notes) included in the FCCI SEC Reports presents
fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position of FCCI as
of the respective dates thereof, and the other related statements (including the
related notes) included therein present fairly, in all material respects, the
results of operations and the changes in financial position of FCCI for the
respective periods or as of the respective dates set forth therein, all in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied
during the periods involved, except as otherwise noted therein and subject, in
the case of the unaudited interim financial statements, to normal year-end
adjustments and any other adjustments described therein. All of the FCCI SEC
Reports, as of their respective dates (as amended through the date hereof),
complied in all material respects with the requirements of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 and the applicable rules and regulations thereunder.


SECTION 3.14.  FINDERS' FEES. There is no investment banker,
broker, finder or other intermediary which has been retained by or is authorized
to act on behalf of FCCI who might be entitled to any fee or commission from
FCCI or any Purchaser in connection with the execution, delivery or performance
of this Agreement or the Sale.



ARTICLE IV.




REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF PURCHASERS



The Purchasers, severally and not jointly, represent and
warrant to FCCI that:


SECTION 4.1.  EXISTENCE AND POWER. Each Purchaser, except
Community Cable, is a limited partnership duly organized, validly existing and
in good standing under the laws of the State of California. Community Cable is a
limited partnership duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under
the laws of the State of Delaware.


SECTION 4.2.  AUTHORIZATION. Each Purchaser has the
partnership power to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the acquisition
of the Cable System(s) to be acquired by it in the Sale. The execution and
delivery by each Purchaser of this Agreement and the consummation by each
Purchaser of the Sale has been duly authorized by all necessary partnership
action.


9





SECTION 4.3.  GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATION. The execution and
delivery of this Agreement by each Purchaser, and the performance by each
Purchaser of this Agreement, and the consummation by each Purchaser of the
acquisition of the Cable System(s) to be acquired by it in the Sale, require no
material action by or in respect of, or material filing with, any Governmental
Authority other than compliance with any applicable requirements of the HSR Act,
and the Local Authorizations.


SECTION 4.4.  NON-CONTRAVENTION. The execution, delivery and
performance of this Agreement by each Purchaser, and the consummation by each
Purchaser of the acquisition of the Cable System(s) to be acquired by it in the
Sale, do not or on or before the Closing Date will not, (a) contravene the
partnership agreement of any Purchaser or (b) subject to obtaining the consents
described in Schedule 4.4 constitute a breach or default (including any event
that, with the passage of time or giving of notice, or both, would become a
breach or default) under or give rise to a right of termination, cancellation,
first refusal or acceleration under any applicable material Legal Requirement or
any material judgment, injunction, order, decree, contract, license, lease,
indenture, mortgage, loan agreement, note or other agreement or instrument as to
which any Purchaser is a party or by which any of its properties may be bound,
the effect of which would be to materially impair the ability of any Purchaser
to perform its obligations under this Agreement.


SECTION 4.5.  BINDING EFFECT. This Agreement has been duly
executed and delivered by each Purchaser, and when executed by the parties
hereto, this Agreement constitutes a valid and binding obligation of each
Purchaser, enforceable against each Purchaser in accordance with its terms,
except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency,
reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally
or by the principles governing the availability of equitable remedies.


SECTION 4.6.  LITIGATION. There are no actions, suits or
proceedings pending and, to the knowledge of any Purchaser, there are no claims,
grievances, governmental investigations, actions, suits or proceedings
threatened, against or affecting any Purchaser at law or in equity or before or
by any Governmental Authority, or before or by an arbitrator or arbitration
board which would materially delay the Closing. There are no judgments, decrees
or orders outstanding against any Purchaser with respect to the Sale.


SECTION 4.7.  COMPLIANCE WITH LEGAL REQUIREMENTS.  Each
Purchaser is in compliance with all applicable Legal Requirements, except as
would not materially delay the Closing.


SECTION 4.8.  QUALIFICATION OF PURCHASERS. Each Purchaser is
and pending Closing will be legally, technically, financially and otherwise
qualified under the Communications Act to acquire and operate the Cable Systems.
To the knowledge of the Purchasers, there are no facts or proceedings which
would reasonably be expected to disqualify any Purchaser under the
Communications Act from acquiring or operating the Cable Systems or would cause
the FCC to not approve the transfer of control of the FCC Licenses to the
applicable Purchasers. No Purchaser has any knowledge of any fact or
circumstance relating to any Purchaser or any of their Affiliates that would
reasonably be


10





expected to (i) cause the filing of any material objection to the FCC
application for transfer of control of the FCC Licenses as provided for in this
Agreement, or (ii) cause the FCC to deny the FCC application for transfer of
control of the FCC Licenses as provided for in this Agreement, or (iii) lead to
a delay in the processing of the FCC application for transfer of control of the
FCC Licenses as provided for in this Agreement. No waiver of any FCC rule or
policy is necessary to be obtained by any Purchaser and/or Affiliates thereof
for the grant of the FCC Consents as provided for in this Agreement, nor will
processing pursuant to any exception to a rule of general applicability be
requested or required in connection with the consummation by any Purchaser of
the transactions contemplated hereby.


SECTION 4.9.  FINDERS' FEES. There is no investment banker,
broker, finder or other intermediary which has been retained by or is authorized
to act on behalf of any Purchaser who might be entitled to any fee or commission
from any Purchaser in connection with the execution, delivery or performance of
this Agreement or the Sale.



ARTICLE V.




CONDITIONS



SECTION 5.1.  MUTUAL CONDITIONS. The obligations of FCCI on
the one hand and the Purchasers on the other to take the actions required to be
taken by them pursuant to Article II shall be subject to the satisfaction of
each of the following conditions, each of which may be waived by FCCI or the
Purchasers:


(a) Any applicable waiting period (and any extension thereof)
under the HSR Act shall have expired or been terminated without the commencement
or threat of any litigation by a Governmental Authority of competent
jurisdiction to restrain the consummation of the Sale contemplated by this
Agreement in any material respect.


(b) No order, stay, judgment or decree shall have been issued
by any court and be in effect restraining or prohibiting the consummation of the
Sale in any material respect.


(c) All consents required to be obtained in connection with
the Sale shall have been obtained and remain in full force and effect.


SECTION 5.2   ACCURACY OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.


(a) The obligations of FCCI to take the actions required to be
taken by it pursuant to Article II shall be subject to the satisfaction of the
following condition, which may be waived by FCCI: the representations and
warranties of each of the Purchasers set forth in Article IV shall be true and
correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing except as would
not have a Material Adverse Effect on the ability of any Purchaser to consummate
the transactions contemplated hereby.


11





(b) The obligations of each Purchaser to take the actions
required to be taken by it pursuant to Article II shall be subject to the
satisfaction of the following condition, which may be waived by the Purchasers:

the representations and warranties of FCCI set forth in Article III shall be
true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing except
as would not have a Material Adverse Effect on (i) the ability of any Purchaser
to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or (ii) the business,
operations, financial condition or results of operation of FCCI.


SECTION 5.3.  ADDITIONAL CONDITION TO THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE
PURCHASERS. The obligations of the Purchasers to take the action required to be
taken by them pursuant to Article II shall be subject to the receipt by each
Purchaser of financing in an amount necessary to satisfy each Purchaser's
obligations under Article II and the performance by each other Purchaser of its
obligations hereunder.



ARTICLE VI.




COVENANTS



SECTION 6.1.  PRESERVATION OF BUSINESS. Except as contemplated
by this Agreement, FCCI will use its best efforts to preserve its business
organization intact, to keep available to the Purchasers the services of its
present employees, and to preserve for the Purchasers the goodwill of the
suppliers, customers and others having business relations with FCCI.


SECTION 6.2.  CONSUMMATION OF THE SALE. Each of the parties
hereto agrees that it shall, prior to, on and after the Closing, take or cause
to be taken and cause their respective affiliates to take or cause to be taken
such actions, and execute, deliver and file or cause to be executed, delivered
and filed, such certificates, documents and instruments, and obtain such
consents, as may be necessary or reasonably requested in connection with the
consummation of the Sale contemplated by this Agreement or in order to fully
effectuate the purposes, terms and conditions of this Agreement.



ARTICLE VII.




MISCELLANEOUS



SECTION 7.1.  TERMINATION. This Agreement may be terminated at
any time prior to the Closing by FCCI or any Purchaser if the Sale shall not
have been consummated on or before December 31, 1997, unless the failure to
consummate the Sale is the result of a willful and material breach of this
Agreement by the party seeking to terminate this Agreement; provided, however,
that the December 31, 1997 termination date shall be extended to March 31, 1998
if (i) all conditions to the Closing have been satisfied on or before December
31, 1997 except the receipt of one or more required Local Authority


12





Consents and (ii) the General Partner, in its reasonable judgment, believes that
the pending Local Authority Consents are likely to be obtained on or before
March 31, 1998.


SECTION 7.2.  EXPENSES. Except as expressly set forth herein,
the fees and expenses (including the fees of any lawyers, accountants,
investment bankers or others engaged by such party) in connection with this
Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby whether or not the Sale is
consummated will be borne by the party incurring such expenses. Any expenses of
the Purchasers generally will be paid by each Purchaser on a pro rata basis by
the Purchasers (based on the relative purchase price as allocated on Schedule
2.1). Any charges, taxes, user fees or other similar costs or expenses incurred
in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall
be allocated among the parties in a manner that is customary for agreements of
this type.


SECTION 7.3.  HEADINGS. The section headings herein are for
convenience of reference only, do not constitute part of this Agreement and will
not be deemed to limit or otherwise affect any of the provisions hereof.
References to Sections, Schedules and Exhibits, unless otherwise indicated, are
references to Sections, Schedules and Exhibits hereof.


SECTION 7.4.  ASSIGNMENT. This Agreement and all provisions
hereof will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and
their respective successors, however, neither this Agreement nor any right,
interest, or obligation hereunder may be assigned by FCCI (other than by
operation of law) without the prior written consent of each Purchaser, and any
such assignment or purported assignment without such consent shall be void.


SECTION 7.5.  ENTIRE AGREEMENT. This Agreement embody the
entire agreement and understanding of the parties with respect to the
transactions contemplated hereby and supersede all prior written or oral
commitments, arrangements or understandings with respect thereto.


SECTION 7.6.  AMENDMENT; WAIVER.


(a) This Agreement may only be amended or modified in writing
signed by the party against whom enforcement of any such amendment or
modification is sought.


(b) Any party hereto may, by an instrument in writing, waive
compliance with any term or provision of this Agreement on the part of such
other party hereto. The waiver by any party hereto of a breach of any term or
provision of this Agreement will not be construed as a waiver of any subsequent
breach.


SECTION 7.7.  COUNTERPARTS.  This Agreement may be executed in
two or more counterparts, all of which will be considered one and the same
agreement and each of which will be deemed an original. All signatures need not
be on one counterpart.


13





SECTION 7.8.  GOVERNING LAW. THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE GOVERNED
BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA (REGARDLESS OF THE LAWS THAT MIGHT BE
APPLICABLE UNDER PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW) AS TO ALL MATTERS, INCLUDING
BUT NOT LIMITED TO MATTERS OF VALIDITY, CONSTRUCTION, EFFECT AND PERFORMANCE.


SECTION 7.9.  SEVERABILITY. If any one or more of the
provisions of this Agreement is held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable,
the validity, legality or enforceability of the remaining provisions of this
Agreement will not be affected thereby, and FCCI and the Purchasers will use
their reasonable efforts to substitute one or more valid, legal and enforceable
provisions which insofar as practicable implement the purposes and intent
hereof. To the extent permitted by applicable law, each party waives any
provision of law which renders any provision of this Agreement invalid, illegal
or unenforceable in any respect.


SECTION 7.10.  THIRD PERSON BENEFICIARIES.  This Agreement is
not intended and shall not be construed to confer upon any Person (other than
FCCI and the Purchasers) any rights or remedies whatsoever.


SECTION 7.11.  SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE. The Purchasers and FCCI
recognize that any breach of any covenant or agreement contained in this
Agreement may give rise to irreparable harm for which money damages would not be
an adequate remedy, and accordingly agree that, in addition to other remedies,
any non-breaching party will be entitled to enforce the agreements and covenants
contained herein of the Purchasers and FCCI, as the case may be, by a decree of
specific performance without the necessity of proving the inadequacy as a remedy
of money damages.


(SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS)


14





IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this
Agreement to be duly executed as of the day and year first above written.



FALCON CLASSIC CABLE INCOME

PROPERTIES, L.P., A CALIFORNIA

LIMITED PARTNERSHIP



By:    Falcon Classic Cable Investors,

L.P., General Partner


By:    Falcon Holding Group, L.P.,

General Partner


By:    Falcon Holding Group, Inc.

General Partner



By:    MICHAEL K. MENEREY





Name:  Michael K. Menerey
Title: Secretary and Chief
Financial Officer



FALCON COMMUNITY CABLE, L.P.,

A DELAWARE LIMITED

PARTNERSHIP



By:    Falcon Holding Group, L.P.,

General Partner


By:    Falcon Holding Group, Inc.

General Partner



By:    MICHAEL K. MENEREY





Name:  Michael K. Menerey
Title: Secretary and Chief
Financial Officer



15






FALCON CABLE MEDIA, A

CALIFORNIA LIMITED PARTNERSHIP



By:    Falcon Holding Group, L.P.,

General Partner


By:    Falcon Holding Group, Inc.

General Partner



By:    MICHAEL K. MENEREY





Name:  Michael K. Menerey
Title: Secretary and Chief
Financial Officer



FALCON CABLE SYSTEMS

COMPANY II, L.P., A CALIFORNIA

LIMITED PARTNERSHIP



By:    Falcon Holding Group, L.P.,

General Partner


By:    Falcon Holding Group, Inc.

General Partner



By:    MICHAEL K. MENEREY





Name:  Michael K. Menerey
Title: Secretary and Chief
Financial Officer



16








SCHEDULE 2.1




ALLOCATION OF PURCHASE PRICE AND CABLE SYSTEMS ACQUIRED







        Purchaser                              Cable System                    Purchase Price
        ---------                              ------------                    --------------

Falcon Community Cable                   Redmond, Oregon                       $ 6,200,000

Falcon Cable Media                       Burke County, North                   $19,000,000
                                         Carolina

Falcon Community Cable                   Somerset, Kentucky                    $31,000,000

Falcon Cable Media                       Centreville, Maryland                 $23,000,000

Falcon Cable Systems
Company II, L.P.                         California City, California           $ 2,800,000
                                                                               -----------
                                                                   TOTAL       $82,000,000
                                                                               ===========











Sched. 2.1 -- 1







SCHEDULE 3.4




CONSENTS REQUIRED UNDER CABLE SYSTEM CONTRACTS







                                              GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITIES
  CABLE SYSTEM                                   REQUIRED TO CONSENT
  ------------                                ------------------------
Burke County, NC                              Burke County, NC
                                              Connelly Springs, NC
                                              Drexel, NC
                                              Glen Alpine, NC
                                              Rutherford College, NC
                                              Valdese, NC

California City, CA                           California City, CA

Centreville, MD                               Barclay, MD
                                              Betterton, MD
                                              Centreville, MD
                                              Chestertown, MD
                                              Church Hill, MD
                                              Kent County, MD
                                              Millington, MD
                                              Oxford, MD
                                              Queen Anne's County, MD
                                              Queenstown, MD
                                              Rock Hall, MD
                                              St. Michaels, MD
                                              Sudlersville, MD
                                              Talbot County, MD
                                              Templeville, MD
                                              Trappe, MD

Redmond, OR                                   Redmond, OR

Somerset, KY                                  Adair County, KY
                                              Burnside, KY
                                              Columbia, KY
                                              Eubank, KY
                                              Ferguson, KY
                                              Laurel County, KY
                                              Lincoln County (Eubank), KY
                                              Lincoln County (McKinney), KY
                                              Pulaski Co. (Burnside), KY
                                              Pulaski Co. (North), KY
                                              Science Hill, KY
                                              Somerset, KY









Sched. 3.4 -- 1







SCHEDULE 4.4




PURCHASER CONSENTS



1.       Consent from the FHGLP bank group.


2.       Consent from the Board of Representatives and partners of FHGLP
pursuant to its Third Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited
Partnership.



Sched. 4.4 -- 1









BROKERAGE PARTNERS


































© 1995-2017
EDGAR Online, Inc.
All rights reserved  NASDAQ:
EDGR 
Solutions for Corporations  
Terms of Use  
Privacy Statement












Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version



















California Business Directory - Companies and People Search









































California Business Directory













Advertisements








Company profiles trending over the last 7 days



















Silverback 5150 Pictures, LLC

                                                
                                                    Beverly Hills, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Allen Hughes










Entit Software LLC

                                                
                                                    Sunnyvale, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jeremy K. Cox
Christopher Hsu
Remi Thomas










DAR Waterfront & Associates, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Sherman Oaks, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Daniel A. Rivero










Sturmer Pippin Investments, LLC

                                                
                                                    Redding, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
H36 Sturmer Pippin Holding Company, LLC










Honey and Lace, LLC

                                                
                                                    Beaumont, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Richard Gail Ingram
Dianne Ingram










Big Bay City, LLC

                                                
                                                    Beverly Hills, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Kaley Cuoco Living Trust










Unification Technology, LLC

                                                
                                                    Fremont, CA
                                                
                                        










Dura Logistics, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Chino, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Eric James Price
Varoujean Salatian










Mpower Networks Services, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Richard Jalkut










H&S Energy, LLC

                                                
                                                    Orange, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Hassan & Sons, Inc.










The Ululu Company

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Matt Groening










Duke Partners II, LLC

                                                
                                                    Redondo Beach, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Wedgewood LLC
Gregory L. Geiser
David R. Wehrly










Mirando Productions, LLC

                                                
                                                    Los Gatos, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Netflix Studios, Inc.
Netflix Studios, LLC










Afinarte Music, LLC

                                                
                                                    Ontario, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jorge Gaxiola
Luis M. Magallon










Raterlabs, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Pleasanton, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Daren Russell Jackson
Monique Jackson










Modgene Pharma LLC

                                                
                                                    Cardiff, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
J. Gregor Sutcliffe
Brian Hilbush










Defcon-1 of Temecula, Lp

                                                
                                                    Temecula, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jacob Goodell
Alan McEwan










Breckenridge Property Fund 2016, LLC

                                                
                                                    Redondo Beach, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
David R. Wehrly
Gregory L. Geiser
Wedgewood LLC










Salomon Investment Partners, LLC

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Alejandro Salomon










Sisyphus Touring, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jared Leto










Off Price Apparel, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Santa Monica, CA
                                                
                                        










Sonder Restaurant Bakersfield, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Bakersfield, CA
                                                
                                        










Atz Ventures Corp.

                                                
                                                    City of Industry, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jason Ho










Clear Recon Corp

                                                
                                                    San Diego, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Steven W. Pite
David S. Dallal
Arianna L. Black










Adventures In Wonderland, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jared Leto










Necronomicom, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Jared Leto










Dli Properties LLC

                                                
                                                    Agoura Hills, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Strategic Acquisitions










Gep Talent Services, LLC

                                                
                                                    Burbank, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Gep Atl LLC










Bolt Biotherapeutics, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Pleasanton, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Peter Moldt










Central Coast Chronic Inc.

                                                
                                                    Santa Maria, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Matthew Simas










Rasier, LLC

                                                
                                                    San Francisco, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Karen Walker
Gautam Gupta
Axel Martinez










Kai Os Technologies Inc.

                                                
                                                    Irvine, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Daisy Tuen Yi Chan










Treyball Development, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Harry Smith










Kianor Shah DMD, PC

                                                
                                                    Irvine, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Kianor Shahmohammadi










Mr Big Shot Fancy Pants Productions

                                                
                                                    Glendale, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Timothy Doyle










Dome Garage, LLC

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Nationwide Theatres Corp.










Not Too Big to Fall Association, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Sunnyvale, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Nigel Johnson










Tiger Financial Holdings LLC

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Aysen Ozkan
Brian Ozkan Trust 2/12/
Brian Ozkan Trust Dated 2 12 07










Psiquantum, Corp.

                                                
                                                    Palo Alto, CA
                                                
                                        










Arirang Mongolian Buffet LLC

                                                
                                                    Clovis, CA
                                                
                                        










Hungry Jackal Productions, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Burbank, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Dustin Lance Black










Moorish Dignity Productions, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Los Angeles, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Monica Owusu-Breen










Xcl Titling Trust

                                                
                                                    San Francisco, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Wilmington Trust National Association
Xchange Leasing, LLC










Imperishable Crown LLC

                                                
                                                    Fresno, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Gianeh Arakelyan
Matthew Allen Garabedian










Progenitech, LLC

                                                
                                                    Azusa, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Renee Ying
Jeffrey Ying
Renee Chen










Too Many Uncles, LLC

                                                
                                                    Burbank, CA
                                                
                                        










F&L Galaxy Inc.

                                                
                                                    Walnut, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Lei Pei










Fashion Nova, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Panorama City, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Richard Saghian










Three Sons & A Dog, Inc.

                                                
                                                    Granada Hills, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
Fordall Cole
Ford V. Cole










Colourpop Cosmetics, LLC

                                                
                                                    Ventura, CA
                                                
                                        

                                                People
                                                
John Nelson
Laura Nelson



















Recently found companies





Company
City




Lightning Credit Solutions LLC
22 days ago


Los Angeles




Brainesis Inc
22 days ago


San Gabriel




Field/Paoli Architects, Inc.
22 days ago


San Francisco




Asm Equities, Inc.
22 days ago


Los Angeles




I’'ll Just Open A Shop Inc
22 days ago


Alhambra




Adamas Pharma, LLC
22 days ago


Emeryville




Ring Protect Inc.
22 days ago


Santa Monica




Coresystems USA Inc.
23 days ago


San Francisco




Reason 4 Sports LLC
23 days ago


Encino




Pevii Plano Block A, LLC
23 days ago


Los Angeles




Vicura Dfw, LLC
23 days ago


Corona del Mar




Windsor 5250 Spe, LLC
23 days ago


Newport Beach




Cwsfg 17 Galleria 5250, LLC
23 days ago


Newport Beach




Teledyne E2V, Inc.
23 days ago


Milpitas




Cws Galleria 5250, L.P.
23 days ago


Newport Beach




Regents 5250 Spe, LLC
23 days ago


Newport Beach




Msl Sacto, LLC
23 days ago


Costa Mesa




Smith Legacy, LLC
23 days ago


Encino




Wip - Arbor Vista 2, LLC
23 days ago


San Francisco




Hill Country Elephant Preserve
23 days ago


Perris




Gokairav Tx LLC
23 days ago


Tustin




Eternity Bay Group LLC
24 days ago


Danville




2020 Beast Holdings, LLC
24 days ago


City of Industry




Miami Color Creations LLC
24 days ago


Encino




Beakerbox, LLC
24 days ago


Los Angeles




Moonlights LLC
25 days ago


Reseda




Squire Financial Services LLC
25 days ago


La Quinta




Pelican Ranch LLC
25 days ago


Valley Village




Metalk and His Friends Technology, LLC
25 days ago


San Jose




Tech Financial, LLC
25 days ago


Beverly Hills




Unvig, LLC
25 days ago


Los Angeles




Carlmont Hills, LLC
25 days ago


Los Altos Hills




A Better Community LLC
25 days ago


Bakersfield




Golestan Properties, LLC
25 days ago


Los Gatos




Financial Reporting Specialists LLC
25 days ago


Glendale




J & R Restaurants, LLC
25 days ago


Bassett




Alt Services LLC
25 days ago


Pioneer




Nabuk Services, LLC
25 days ago


Bakersfield




Los Angeles Basketball Academy LLC
25 days ago


Los Angeles




Golden Fabricates LLC.
25 days ago


Turlock




Memo's Tires & Auto Repair, LLC
25 days ago


Kerman




Hello June Films LLC
25 days ago


North Hollywood




O'Dell Farms, LLC
25 days ago


Cardiff




Plebs and Largess LLC
25 days ago


Pacific Palisades




Dillon J Shook, LLC
25 days ago


Encino




Terra Luna Farms, LLC
25 days ago


Rohnert Park




Atlas Behavior Services LLC
25 days ago


Sherman Oaks




So On Music LLC
25 days ago


Los Angeles




Citygirlgonemom, LLC
25 days ago


Carlsbad




Cape Nano Products LLC
25 days ago


San Diego









Top cities in California





Rank
City
Companies Found




                1
            


                    Los Angeles
                


                799,067
            



                2
            


                    San Diego
                


                349,382
            



                3
            


                    San Francisco
                


                318,066
            



                4
            


                    San Jose
                


                179,352
            



                5
            


                    Sacramento
                


                146,371
            



                6
            


                    Irvine
                


                137,614
            



                7
            


                    Beverly Hills
                


                115,428
            



                8
            


                    Newport Beach
                


                93,146
            



                9
            


                    Santa Monica
                


                89,771
            



                10
            


                    Oakland
                


                89,047
            



                11
            


                    Long Beach
                


                88,013
            



                12
            


                    Fresno
                


                80,971
            



                13
            


                    Santa Ana
                


                76,441
            



                14
            


                    Anaheim
                


                75,623
            



                15
            


                    Glendale
                


                73,389
            



                16
            


                    Bakersfield
                


                67,524
            



                17
            


                    Pasadena
                


                64,698
            



                18
            


                    Riverside
                


                63,638
            



                19
            


                    Torrance
                


                59,867
            



                20
            


                    Huntington Beach
                


                58,605
            



                21
            


                    Encino
                


                53,896
            



                22
            


                    Woodland Hills
                


                53,517
            



                23
            


                    Santa Barbara
                


                51,953
            



                24
            


                    Costa Mesa
                


                51,518
            



                25
            


                    Orange
                


                50,335
            



                26
            


                    Sherman Oaks
                


                50,045
            



                27
            


                    Burbank
                


                48,407
            



                28
            


                    Palo Alto
                


                48,091
            



                29
            


                    Fremont
                


                48,000
            



                30
            


                    Carlsbad
                


                47,048
            



                31
            


                    Van Nuys
                


                46,072
            



                32
            


                    Corona
                


                42,617
            



                33
            


                    Santa Rosa
                


                42,557
            



                34
            


                    North Hollywood
                


                41,253
            



                35
            


                    San Mateo
                


                41,067
            



                36
            


                    Stockton
                


                39,491
            



                37
            


                    Santa Clara
                


                38,274
            



                38
            


                    Rancho Cucamonga
                


                36,698
            



                39
            


                    Walnut Creek
                


                35,790
            



                40
            


                    Chula Vista
                


                34,464
            



                41
            


                    La Jolla
                


                34,000
            



                42
            


                    Sunnyvale
                


                33,792
            



                43
            


                    Fullerton
                


                33,733
            



                44
            


                    Escondido
                


                33,649
            



                45
            


                    Garden Grove
                


                33,250
            



                46
            


                    Modesto
                


                33,096
            



                47
            


                    Berkeley
                


                32,758
            



                48
            


                    West Hollywood
                


                32,385
            



                49
            


                    Temecula
                


                32,003
            



                50
            


                    Tustin
                


                31,029
            



                51
            


                    Roseville
                


                30,902
            



                52
            


                    Ontario
                


                30,551
            



                53
            


                    El Cajon
                


                30,360
            



                54
            


                    Redwood City
                


                29,912
            



                55
            


                    Hayward
                


                29,822
            



                56
            


                    Arcadia
                


                29,379
            



                57
            


                    Thousand Oaks
                


                29,135
            



                58
            


                    Oceanside
                


                29,089
            



                59
            


                    Ventura
                


                29,076
            



                60
            


                    Alhambra
                


                29,007
            



                61
            


                    San Rafael
                


                28,826
            



                62
            


                    Mission Viejo
                


                28,037
            



                63
            


                    San Bernardino
                


                27,266
            



                64
            


                    Culver City
                


                26,766
            



                65
            


                    Redondo Beach
                


                26,495
            



                66
            


                    Gardena
                


                26,194
            



                67
            


                    Mountain View
                


                26,120
            



                68
            


                    Simi Valley
                


                25,653
            



                69
            


                    Calabasas
                


                25,004
            



                70
            


                    Whittier
                


                24,942
            



                71
            


                    Concord
                


                24,930
            



                72
            


                    Pleasanton
                


                24,750
            



                73
            


                    San Clemente
                


                24,265
            



                74
            


                    Encinitas
                


                24,215
            



                75
            


                    Menlo Park
                


                24,054
            



                76
            


                    Murrieta
                


                23,875
            



                77
            


                    Northridge
                


                23,777
            



                78
            


                    Oxnard
                


                23,294
            



                79
            


                    Inglewood
                


                23,085
            



                80
            


                    Westlake Village
                


                23,012
            



                81
            


                    Laguna Niguel
                


                22,753
            



                82
            


                    Redding
                


                22,679
            



                83
            


                    Fontana
                


                22,678
            



                84
            


                    Vista
                


                22,678
            



                85
            


                    Monterey Park
                


                22,674
            



                86
            


                    Studio City
                


                22,417
            



                87
            


                    Marina Del Rey
                


                22,315
            



                88
            


                    Palm Desert
                


                22,140
            



                89
            


                    Napa
                


                22,104
            



                90
            


                    Santa Cruz
                


                21,987
            



                91
            


                    Burlingame
                


                21,744
            



                92
            


                    San Ramon
                


                21,744
            



                93
            


                    Walnut
                


                21,646
            



                94
            


                    Tarzana
                


                21,532
            



                95
            


                    Valencia
                


                21,496
            



                96
            


                    San Gabriel
                


                21,443
            



                97
            


                    Los Gatos
                


                21,370
            



                98
            


                    Upland
                


                21,308
            



                99
            


                    Salinas
                


                21,077
            



                100
            


                    Downey
                


                20,976
            



                101
            


                    Elk Grove
                


                20,812
            



                102
            


                    San Marcos
                


                20,479
            



                103
            


                    Manhattan Beach
                


                20,454
            



                104
            


                    Rowland Heights
                


                20,227
            



                105
            


                    Lancaster
                


                20,170
            



                106
            


                    Camarillo
                


                20,076
            



                107
            


                    Chatsworth
                


                20,045
            



                108
            


                    Laguna Hills
                


                19,889
            



                109
            


                    West Covina
                


                19,518
            



                110
            


                    Westminster
                


                19,387
            



                111
            


                    Lake Forest
                


                19,230
            



                112
            


                    Pomona
                


                19,226
            



                113
            


                    Cupertino
                


                19,151
            



                114
            


                    Visalia
                


                19,151
            



                115
            


                    Palm Springs
                


                19,127
            



                116
            


                    Chino
                


                19,120
            



                117
            


                    La Mesa
                


                19,111
            



                118
            


                    Danville
                


                19,049
            



                119
            


                    Canoga Park
                


                18,952
            



                120
            


                    Los Altos
                


                18,895
            



                121
            


                    Fountain Valley
                


                18,721
            



                122
            


                    Cerritos
                


                18,507
            



                123
            


                    Yorba Linda
                


                18,303
            



                124
            


                    Chico
                


                18,269
            



                125
            


                    Campbell
                


                18,188
            



                126
            


                    San Leandro
                


                18,103
            



                127
            


                    San Luis Obispo
                


                17,902
            



                128
            


                    El Monte
                


                17,776
            



                129
            


                    Diamond Bar
                


                17,721
            



                130
            


                    Palmdale
                


                17,572
            



                131
            


                    Laguna Beach
                


                17,372
            



                132
            


                    Brea
                


                16,964
            



                133
            


                    Moreno Valley
                


                16,908
            



                134
            


                    Venice
                


                16,878
            



                135
            


                    Milpitas
                


                16,869
            



                136
            


                    El Segundo
                


                16,820
            



                137
            


                    Carson
                


                16,609
            



                138
            


                    Aliso Viejo
                


                16,433
            



                139
            


                    Buena Park
                


                16,365
            



                140
            


                    Agoura Hills
                


                16,341
            



                141
            


                    Novato
                


                16,215
            



                142
            


                    Covina
                


                16,187
            



                143
            


                    Clovis
                


                16,129
            



                144
            


                    Livermore
                


                16,098
            



                145
            


                    Petaluma
                


                16,043
            



                146
            


                    Redlands
                


                16,040
            



                147
            


                    Folsom
                


                15,585
            



                148
            


                    Santa Maria
                


                15,556
            



                149
            


                    South San Francisco
                


                15,154
            



                150
            


                    Alameda
                


                15,108
            



                151
            


                    Malibu
                


                15,091
            



                152
            


                    Santa Fe Springs
                


                15,041
            



                153
            


                    Rancho Cordova
                


                14,999
            



                154
            


                    Citrus Heights
                


                14,830
            



                155
            


                    Chino Hills
                


                14,781
            



                156
            


                    Compton
                


                14,605
            



                157
            


                    Mill Valley
                


                14,602
            



                158
            


                    Hacienda Heights
                


                14,555
            



                159
            


                    Fairfield
                


                14,554
            



                160
            


                    San Juan Capistrano
                


                14,549
            



                161
            


                    Victorville
                


                14,464
            



                162
            


                    Vallejo
                


                14,397
            



                163
            


                    La Puente
                


                14,385
            



                164
            


                    Santa Clarita
                


                14,035
            



                165
            


                    Rosemead
                


                13,979
            



                166
            


                    Poway
                


                13,905
            



                167
            


                    Monterey
                


                13,725
            



                168
            


                    Pacific Palisades
                


                13,441
            



                169
            


                    Granada Hills
                


                13,276
            



                170
            


                    South El Monte
                


                13,167
            



                171
            


                    San Pedro
                


                13,145
            



                172
            


                    Hawthorne
                


                12,967
            



                173
            


                    Rocklin
                


                12,960
            



                174
            


                    Tracy
                


                12,667
            



                175
            


                    Reseda
                


                12,635
            



                176
            


                    Auburn
                


                12,633
            



                177
            


                    Hemet
                


                12,430
            



                178
            


                    Dana Point
                


                12,358
            



                179
            


                    La Habra
                


                12,202
            



                180
            


                    Vacaville
                


                12,186
            



                181
            


                    Richmond
                


                12,161
            



                182
            


                    Lafayette
                


                12,083
            



                183
            


                    Saratoga
                


                11,971
            



                184
            


                    Daly City
                


                11,801
            



                185
            


                    Del Mar
                


                11,698
            



                186
            


                    Glendora
                


                11,657
            



                187
            


                    Antioch
                


                11,640
            



                188
            


                    Solana Beach
                


                11,488
            



                189
            


                    San Carlos
                


                11,448
            



                190
            


                    Yuba City
                


                11,371
            



                191
            


                    City of Industry
                


                11,265
            



                192
            


                    Lodi
                


                11,253
            



                193
            


                    Rancho Palos Verdes
                


                11,217
            



                194
            


                    Carmichael
                


                11,207
            



                195
            


                    Placentia
                


                11,183
            



                196
            


                    Palos Verdes Peninsula
                


                11,089
            



                197
            


                    Dublin
                


                11,072
            



                198
            


                    Lakewood
                


                11,011
            



                199
            


                    Norwalk
                


                11,009
            



                200
            


                    Hesperia
                


                10,975
            



                201
            


                    Fallbrook
                


                10,864
            



                202
            


                    San Dimas
                


                10,717
            



                203
            


                    Bellflower
                


                10,697
            



                204
            


                    Cypress
                


                10,635
            



                205
            


                    Morgan Hill
                


                10,621
            



                206
            


                    Fair Oaks
                


                10,559
            



                207
            


                    Monrovia
                


                10,545
            



                208
            


                    Montebello
                


                10,527
            



                209
            


                    Grass Valley
                


                10,502
            



                210
            


                    Sylmar
                


                10,495
            



                211
            


                    El Dorado Hills
                


                10,428
            



                212
            


                    Davis
                


                10,405
            



                213
            


                    Rancho Santa Margarita
                


                10,366
            



                214
            


                    Newbury Park
                


                10,343
            



                215
            


                    Sun Valley
                


                10,266
            



                216
            


                    Valley Village
                


                10,265
            



                217
            


                    La Mirada
                


                10,241
            



                218
            


                    Paso Robles
                


                10,221
            



                219
            


                    Apple Valley
                


                10,173
            



                220
            


                    Indio
                


                10,157
            



                221
            


                    Canyon Country
                


                10,155
            



                222
            


                    Hermosa Beach
                


                10,115
            



                223
            


                    Union City
                


                10,110
            



                224
            


                    Baldwin Park
                


                10,047
            



                225
            


                    Emeryville
                


                9,905
            



                226
            


                    South Pasadena
                


                9,820
            



                227
            


                    Sausalito
                


                9,766
            



                228
            


                    Temple City
                


                9,659
            



                229
            


                    Lake Elsinore
                


                9,527
            



                230
            


                    Castro Valley
                


                9,440
            



                231
            


                    Rancho Santa Fe
                


                9,412
            



                232
            


                    Turlock
                


                9,336
            



                233
            


                    Sonoma
                


                9,281
            



                234
            


                    Los Alamitos
                


                9,146
            



                235
            


                    Merced
                


                9,030
            



                236
            


                    La Quinta
                


                9,024
            



                237
            


                    Watsonville
                


                9,014
            



                238
            


                    Claremont
                


                8,997
            



                239
            


                    West Hills
                


                8,995
            



                240
            


                    Gilroy
                


                8,993
            



                241
            


                    Corona Del Mar
                


                8,913
            



                242
            


                    Santee
                


                8,887
            



                243
            


                    Rialto
                


                8,828
            



                244
            


                    Pleasant Hill
                


                8,778
            



                245
            


                    Brentwood
                


                8,665
            



                246
            


                    National City
                


                8,538
            



                247
            


                    Spring Valley
                


                8,508
            



                248
            


                    San Marino
                


                8,450
            



                249
            


                    Granite Bay
                


                8,415
            



                250
            


                    Rancho Mirage
                


                8,310
            



                251
            


                    Martinez
                


                8,290
            



                252
            


                    Madera
                


                8,243
            



                253
            


                    Paramount
                


                8,214
            



                254
            


                    Sebastopol
                


                8,185
            



                255
            


                    Belmont
                


                8,169
            



                256
            


                    South Gate
                


                8,116
            



                257
            


                    Manteca
                


                8,112
            



                258
            


                    Newark
                


                8,087
            



                259
            


                    Perris
                


                8,064
            



                260
            


                    La Crescenta
                


                7,984
            



                261
            


                    Eureka
                


                7,941
            



                262
            


                    West Sacramento
                


                7,854
            



                263
            


                    San Bruno
                


                7,788
            



                264
            


                    Woodland
                


                7,730
            



                265
            


                    Seal Beach
                


                7,695
            



                266
            


                    Goleta
                


                7,561
            



                267
            


                    Altadena
                


                7,522
            



                268
            


                    Placerville
                


                7,494
            



                269
            


                    Cathedral City
                


                7,479
            



                270
            


                    Moorpark
                


                7,420
            



                271
            


                    Huntington Park
                


                7,374
            



                272
            


                    Newhall
                


                7,302
            



                273
            


                    Coronado
                


                7,293
            



                274
            


                    North Hills
                


                7,148
            



                275
            


                    Orinda
                


                7,118
            



                276
            


                    Ramona
                


                6,989
            



                277
            


                    Aptos
                


                6,986
            



                278
            


                    Porter Ranch
                


                6,968
            



                279
            


                    Trabuco Canyon
                


                6,830
            



                280
            


                    La Verne
                


                6,796
            



                281
            


                    Panorama City
                


                6,776
            



                282
            


                    Pittsburg
                


                6,760
            



                283
            


                    Arroyo Grande
                


                6,748
            



                284
            


                    Yucaipa
                


                6,735
            



                285
            


                    Colton
                


                6,683
            



                286
            


                    Azusa
                


                6,624
            



                287
            


                    Carmel
                


                6,588
            



                288
            


                    Pico Rivera
                


                6,586
            



                289
            


                    Lincoln
                


                6,556
            



                290
            


                    Pacoima
                


                6,513
            



                291
            


                    Truckee
                


                6,483
            



                292
            


                    Benicia
                


                6,453
            



                293
            


                    South Lake Tahoe
                


                6,422
            



                294
            


                    Hanford
                


                6,380
            



                295
            


                    Atascadero
                


                6,336
            



                296
            


                    Lakeside
                


                6,291
            



                297
            


                    Norco
                


                6,221
            



                298
            


                    Montclair
                


                6,217
            



                299
            


                    Winnetka
                


                6,207
            



                300
            


                    Alamo
                


                6,202
            


















You must be signed in to print.
Once signed in, look for the PDF button.
















Verify real user


























Verify real user













Verify real user


























Verify real user













Verify real user


























Verify real user













Verify real user


























Verify real user













Falcon Community Cable, L.P.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 3:35 PM ET
Diversified Telecommunication Services

Company Overview of Falcon Community Cable, L.P.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Falcon Community Cable, L.P., doing business as Charter Communications, provides broadband communication services. The company was incorporated in 1989 and is based in St. Louis, Missouri. Falcon Community Cable, L.P. operates as a subsidiary of Falcon Cable Communications, LLC.


12405 Powerscourt DriveSt. Louis, MO 63131-3674United StatesFounded in 1989










Key Executives for Falcon Community Cable, L.P.


Falcon Community Cable, L.P. does not have any Key Executives recorded. 





Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 1 Com, Inc. United States 1-800-RECONEX, Inc. United States 123.Net Inc. United States 1800Prepaid United States 186 Communications, LLC United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Falcon Community Cable, L.P., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














FALCON COMMUNITY CABLE, L.P. - Cable Station Profile - FCC Public Inspection Files















 Skip to main content Skip to footer and contact information 



This entity has confirmed that it is uploading to the online public inspection file all new public and political file material on a going-forward basis.
 









Cable Profile 


FALCON COMMUNITY CABLE, L.P.


PSID 002903






Search Station Profile







 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

Equal Employment Opportunity Records

EEO Forms
Additional Documents


EEO Employment Unit ID: 12621

Form 396 




Date Filed
File Number
Fewer than Five Full-Time Employees?
Paper Filing?




2016-09-27
B396 20160927AEU
N
N


2015-09-23
B396 20150923ALB
N
N


2014-09-29
B396 20140929ACR
N
N


2013-09-30
B396 20130930ADD
N
N


2011-09-29
B396 20110929AOH
N
N





 

 
For help or assistance please contact us at 1-877-480-3201 or 1-717-338-2824 (TTY) or you may submit requests online via e-support.
 








































